District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.02

Agency affirmative action plan — Development; submission.

Every District government agency shall develop and submit to the Mayor and Council an affirmative action plan. Such plan shall be submitted within 12 calendar weeks after May 6, 1976, and each year thereafter, at the time each agency’s annual budget is submitted to the Council.

History

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 3, 22 DCR 6538

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-508.
1973 Ed., § 1-320b.